Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 315.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An[No] owner of a pharmacy who is not a pharmacist shall [fail to ]place a
pharmacist in charge of his or her pharmacy and[or] shall not permit any person to
compound or dispense prescription drugs, medicines, or pharmaceuticals in his or
her place of business except in the presence and under the immediate supervision of
a pharmacist.
(2) A[No] manufacturer of pharmaceuticals who is not a pharmacist shall [fail to ]place
a pharmacist in charge of his or her place of business and[or] shall not permit any
person to compound prescription drugs, medicines, or pharmaceuticals in his or her
place of business, except as provided by the board through the promulgation of
administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a[no] person shall not engage
in the practice of pharmacy unless licensed to practice under the provisions of KRS
Chapter 315.
(4) The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Pharmacist interns performing professional practice activities under the
immediate supervision of a licensed pharmacist. The nature and scope of the
activities referred to in this paragraph shall be determined by the board
through administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;
(b) Pharmacist interns and pharmacy technicians performing specifically
identified pharmacy practice activities while under the supervision of a
pharmacist. The nature and scope of the activities referred to in this paragraph
shall be determined by the board through administrative regulation
promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;
(c) Other licensed health care professionals practicing within the statutory scope
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/10/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1814
of their professional practices; or
(d) Volunteer health practitioners providing services under KRS 39A.350 to
39A.366.
(5) (a) As used in this subsection:
1. "Order entry" means the process by which pharmacy personnel validate
prescription data and enter that data into a pharmacy's dispensing or
medication management system. Prescription data includes but is not
limited to patient demographics, prescriber demographics, drug name,
strength, dosage form, quantity, the directions for use, refill
authorization, or any clarifications of the same; and
2. "Order entry verification" means the process by which a pharmacist
verifies prescription data entered in a pharmacy's dispensing or
medication management system after order entry has been completed.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a pharmacist licensed in Kentucky, or a
pharmacy technician registered in Kentucky or a pharmacy intern certified in
Kentucky who is working under the supervision of the pharmacist, from
accessing the electronic database of the pharmacy, from inside or outside of
the pharmacy, to perform order entry, order entry verification, or drug
regimen review as defined in KRS 315.010, if:
1. The pharmacy has established controls to protect the confidentiality and
integrity of protected health information;
2. No part of the pharmacy's database is duplicated, downloaded, or
removed from the electronic database; and
3. The pharmacy is located in Kentucky and is permitted by the board.
(c) Supervision required by paragraph (b) of this subsection may include
electronic supervision.
(d) This subsection shall only apply to:
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/10/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1814
1. Pharmacies that are not open to the public and do not dispense to walk-
in patients in a retail setting; or
2. Hospitals licensed under KRS Chapter 216B.
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize final product
verification and dispensing of a prescription from a location outside of or
other than a pharmacy.
(f) Nothing in this subsection permits pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, or
pharmacy interns to receive hard copy prescriptions outside of the premises of
a permitted pharmacy.
(g) The board shall not require the immediate supervision by a pharmacist of a
pharmacist technician engaging in the stocking, retrieving, or returning of
product to or from the pharmacy inventory, including the stocking and
loading of an automated filling or dispensing system with the use of barcode
technology, under this subsection.
(6) Effective April 1, 2009, an owner of a pharmacy shall not employ a person to assist
in the practice of pharmacy unless the person is registered as a pharmacy technician
by the board or exempt under KRS 315.135.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/10/2026 1:19 PM Jacketed